Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5071YH (4) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2053 Section 1. Section 249A.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. âManaged care contractâ means a 3 contract between the department and a managed care organization 4 that obligates the managed care organization to administer the 5 medical assistance program under this chapter. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. âManaged care organizationâ means a 7 âhealth maintenance organizationâ , as that term is defined in 8 section 514B.1, acting pursuant to a managed care contract. 9 Sec. 2. Section 249A.4, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 9. a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A in determining 12 the method to establish a standardized claim submission and 13 reimbursement process and the level of reimbursement for all 14 medical and health services to be provided under the medical 15 assistance program, after considering benefits received by or 16 services rendered to a recipient by a provider on or after July 17 1, 2027. In establishing such rules, the department shall 18 consider all of the following: 19 a. (1) The promotion of efficient and cost-effective 20 delivery of medical and health services. 21 b. (2) Compliance with federal law and regulations. 22 c. (3) The level of state and federal appropriations for 23 medical assistance. 24 d. (4) Reimbursement at a level as near as possible to 25 After weighing the considerations in subparagraphs (1), (2), 26 and (3), the actual costs and charges after priority is given 27 to the considerations in paragraphs âaâ , âbâ , and âcâ incurred 28 by a provider for any benefits received by or services rendered 29 to a recipient . 30 b. The department shall amend all existing managed care 31 contracts, pursuant to the terms of each contract, to provide 32 for adherence to the standardized claim submission and 33 reimbursement process established under this subsection. All 34 managed care contracts entered into, extended, or renewed 35 -1- LSB 5071YH (4) 91 ak/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2053 by the department on or after July 1, 2027, must provide 1 for adherence to the standardized claim submission and 2 reimbursement process established under this subsection. 3 c. For purposes of this subsection, âclaimâ means a formal 4 request by a provider for reimbursement for benefits received 5 by a recipient or services rendered to a recipient. 6